Missouri, session 2026, HB2442.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
D
Section A. Sections 160.518, 160.522, 161.092, and 161.132, RSMo, are repealed
and four new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 160.518, 160.522,
H
161.092, and 161.132, to read as follows:
160.518. 1. (1) Consistent with the provisions contained in section 160.526, the state
board of educaTtion shall develop, modify, and revise, as necessary, a statewide summative
assessment system that [provides maximum flexibility for local school districts to determine
the degree Ito which students in the public schools of the state are proficient in the knowledge,
skills, and competencies adopted by such board pursuant to section 160.514] satisfies the
W
pupil testing mandates in effect under the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (Pub. L.
114-95), as amended, for each school year.
(2) Results from the assessment created under this subsection shall be used only
for the purposes of complying with the requirements of such federal law and
determining performance districts under sections 163.011 and 163.031 and for no other
purpose.
(3) Results from such assessments shall not be used to classify school districts
and charter schools.
[(2) (a) The statewide assessment system shall assess problem solving, analytical
ability, evaluation, creativity, and application ability in the different content areas and shall be
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2442 2
performance-based to identify what students know, as well as what they are able to do, and
shall enable teachers to evaluate actual academic performance.
(b) The statewide assessment system shall neither promote nor prohibit rote
memorization and shall not include existing versions of tests approved for use pursuant to the
provisions of section 160.257, nor enhanced versions of such tests.
N
(3) After the state board of education adopts and implements academic performance
standards as required under section 161.855, the state board of education shall develop and
adopt a standardized assessment instrument under thisW section based on the academic
performance standards adopted under section 161.855.
(4) The statewide assessment system shall measure, where appropriate by grade level,
a student's knowledge of academic subjects including, but not limited to, reading skills,
A
writing skills, mathematics skills, world and American history, forms of government,
geography and science.
2. The statewide assessment sysRtem shall only permit the academic performance of
students in each school in the state to be tracked against prior academic performance in the
same school.
D
3. (1) The state board of education shall suggest, but not mandate, criteria for a
school to demonstrate that its students learn the knowledge, skills and competencies at
exemplary levels wortHhy of imitation by students in other schools in the state and nation.
(2) Exemplary levels shall be measured by the statewide assessment system
developed pursuant to subsection 1 of this section, or until said statewide assessment system
T
is available, by indicators approved for such use by the state board of education.
(3) The provisions of other law to the contrary notwithstanding, the commissioner of
education mIay, upon request of the school district, present a plan for the waiver of rules and
Wregulations to any such school, to be known as "Outstanding Schools Waivers", consistent
with the provisions of subsection 4 of this section.
4. (1) For any school that meets the criteria established by the state board of
education for three successive school years pursuant to the provisions of subsection 3 of this
section, by August first following the third such school year, the commissioner of education
shall present a plan to the superintendent of the school district in which such school is located
for the waiver of rules and regulations to promote flexibility in the operations of the school
and to enhance and encourage efficiency in the delivery of instructional services.
(2) The provisions of other law to the contrary notwithstanding, the plan presented to
the superintendent shall provide a summary waiver, with no conditions, for the pupil testing
requirements pursuant to section 160.257, in the school.
(3) Further, the provisions of other law to the contrary notwithstanding, the plan shall
detail a means for the waiver of requirements otherwise imposed on the school related to the

HB 2442 3
authority of the state board of education to classify school districts pursuant to subdivision (9)
of section 161.092 and such other rules and regulations as determined by the commissioner of
education, excepting such waivers shall be confined to the school and not other schools in the
district unless such other schools meet the criteria established by the state board of education
consistent with subsection 3 of this section and the waivers shall not include the requirements
N
contained in this section and section 160.514.
(4) Any waiver provided to any school as outlined in this subsection shall be void on
June thirtieth of any school year in which the school fails Wto meet the criteria established by
the state board of education consistent with subsection 3 of this section.
5. The score on any assessment test developed pursuant to this section or this chapter
of any student for whom English is a second language shall not be counted until such time as
A
such student has been educated for three full school years in a school in this state, or in any
other state, in which English is the primary language.]
2. School districts and charterR schools shall create, purchase, or adopt a local
assessment system.
3. The local assessment system shall be:
D
(1) Authentic to student discipline-specific learning, experience, and the
demonstration of performance-based learning;
(2) Related toH curricula taught in the school;
(3) Evaluated and graded in a manner that provides students and teachers with
meaningful feedback that can be used for academic improvement;
T
(4) Developed in consultation with building-level administrators, teachers,
students, parents, and the community; and
(5) IAvailable for demonstration and community inspection.
W[6.] 4. (1) (a) The state board of education shall identify or, if necessary, establish
one or more developmentally appropriate alternate assessments for students who receive
special educational services, as that term is defined pursuant to section 162.675.
(b) In the development of such alternate assessments, the state board shall establish
an advisory panel consisting of a majority of active special education teachers residing in
Missouri and other education professionals as appropriate to research available assessment
options.
(c) The advisory panel shall attempt to identify preexisting developmentally
appropriate alternate assessments but shall, if necessary, develop alternate assessments and
recommend one or more alternate assessments for adoption by the state board.
(d) The state board shall consider the recommendations of the advisory council in
establishing such alternate assessment or assessments.

HB 2442 4
(2) Any student who receives special educational services, as that term is defined
pursuant to section 162.675, shall be assessed by an alternate assessment established pursuant
to this subsection upon a determination by the student's individualized education program
team that such alternate assessment is more appropriate to assess the student's knowledge,
skills and competencies than the assessment developed pursuant to subsection 1 of this
N
section.
(3) The alternate assessment shall evaluate the student's independent living skills,
which include how effectively the student addresses commWon life demands and how well the
student meets standards for personal independence expected for someone in the student's age
group, sociocultural background, and community setting.
[7.] 5. The state board of education shall also develop recommendations regarding
A
100 alternate assessments for any military dependent who relocates to Missouri after the
101 commencement of a school term, in order to accommodate such student while ensuring that
102 he or she is proficient in the knowledgRe, skills, and competencies adopted under section
103 160.514.
104 [8.] 6. (1) As used in this subsection, the following terms mean:
D
105 (a) "Department", the department of elementary and secondary education;
106 (b) "Grade-level equivalence", a metric developed for grades three to eight and used
107 by the department to sHhow a student's proximity to doing grade-level work;
108 (c) "Parent", a parent, guardian, custodian, or other person with authority to act on
109 behalf of a student.
T
110 (2) Grade-level equivalence, as developed and used under this subsection, shall
111 consist of a student's knowledge of academic subjects by grade level and performance-level
112 descriptorsI indicating whether such student is ready for the next grade or level of education.
113 WSuch performance-level descriptors shall consist of the following:
114 (a) Advanced, which shall indicate that such student:
115 a. Demonstrates superior performance on challenging grade-level subject matter;
116 b. Is above such student's current grade or level of education; and
117 c. Is ready for, at a minimum, the next grade or level of education;
118 (b) Proficient, which shall indicate that such student:
119 a. Demonstrates mastery over all appropriate grade-level standards and has
120 introductory-level knowledge for the next grade or level of education;
121 b. May be above such student's current grade or level of education in some areas; and
122 c. Is ready for the next grade or level of education;
123 (c) Grade level, which shall indicate that such student:
124 a. Demonstrates mastery over appropriate grade-level subject matter;
125 b. Is at such student's current grade or level of education; and

HB 2442 5
126 c. May be ready, with appropriate reinforcement, for the next grade or level of
127 education;
128 (d) Basic, which shall indicate that such student:
129 a. Demonstrates partial mastery of the essential knowledge and skills appropriate to
130 such student's grade or level of education;
N
131 b. May not be at such student's current grade or level of education; and
132 c. May not be ready, without appropriate remediation, for the next grade or level of
133 education; and W
134 (e) Below basic, which shall indicate that such student:
135 a. Has failed to perform, at a minimum, at the limited knowledge level necessary for
136 such student's grade or level of education;
A
137 b. Is not at such student's current grade or level of education; and
138 c. Has been determined to be at the specific lower grade or level of education
139 measured by and listed in such student'sR statewide assessment score.
140 (3) (a) Such grade-level equivalence shall be determined at the same time each
141 student's academic performance is measured by the statewide assessment system developed
D
142 under this section.
143 (b) Such grade-level equivalence shall be provided at the same time such student's
144 statewide assessment sHcore is reported to such student or such student's parent.
145 (4) (a) Data related to grade-level equivalence shall be searchable on a building-by-
146 building, school-by-school, district-by-district, and statewide basis on the department's school
T
147 accountability report card developed under section 160.522.
148 (b) Data related to grade-level equivalence shall display the percentage of students
149 whose perfIormance-level descriptor is grade level or above on a building-by-building, school-
150 Wby-school, district-by-district, and statewide basis.
151 (c) No data related to grade-level equivalence shall be disclosed in any form that
152 allows the personal identification of any student to any individual or entity except such
153 student or such student's parent.
154 (5) The provisions of subsection 2 of section 160.514 shall not apply to the
155 development of the grade-level equivalence metric.
156 (6) The department may choose a third-party nonprofit entity to develop the grade-
157 level equivalence metric.
160.522. 1. The department of elementary and secondary education shall produce or
cause to be produced, at least annually, a school accountability report card for each public
school district, each public school building in a school district, and each charter school in the
state. The report card shall be designed to satisfy state and federal requirements for the
disclosure of statistics about students, staff, finances, academic achievement, and other

HB 2442 6
indicators. The purpose of the report card shall be to provide educational statistics and
accountability information for parents, taxpayers, school personnel, legislators, and the print
and broadcast news media in a standardized, easily accessible form.
2. [(1) The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop a
standard form for the school accountability report card.
N
(2)] The information reported shall include, but not be limited to, the following
information reported by each school district or charter school:
[(a)] (1) The [most recent] accreditation [rating] sWtatus;
[(b)] (2) Enrollment;
[(c)] (3) Rates of pupil attendance;
[(d)] (4) High school dropout rate and graduation rate;
A
[(e)] (5) The number and rate of suspensions of ten days or longer and expulsions of
pupils;
[(f)] (6) The district or charter scRhool ratio of students to administrators and students
to classroom teachers;
[(g)] (7) The average years of experience of professional staff and advanced degrees
D
earned;
[(h)] (8) Student achievement and grade-level equivalence data as measured through
the statewide and locaHl assessment [system] systems developed pursuant to section 160.518;
[(i)] (9) Student scores on the ACT, along with the percentage of graduates taking the
test;
T
[(j)] (10) Average teachers' and administrators' salaries compared to the state
averages;
[(k)I] (11) Average per-pupil current expenditures for the district or charter school as a
Wwhole and by attendance center as reported to the department of elementary and secondary
education;
[(l)] (12) The adjusted tax rate of the district or charter school;
[(m)] (13) The assessed valuation of the district;
[(n)] (14) The percentage of the district or charter school operating budget received
from state, federal, and local sources;
[(o)] (15) The percentage of students eligible for free or reduced-price lunch;
[(p)] (16) Data on the percentage of students continuing their education in
postsecondary programs;
[(q)] (17) Information about the job placement rate for students who complete district
or charter school vocational education programs;
[(r)] (18) Whether the school district or charter school currently has a state-approved
gifted education program; and

HB 2442 7
[(s)] (19) The percentage and number of students who are currently being served in
the district's or charter school's state-approved gifted education program.
3. The report card shall permit the disclosure of data on a school-by-school basis, but
the reporting shall not be personally identifiable to any student or education professional in
the state.
N
4. [The report card shall identify each school or attendance center that has been
identified as a priority school under sections 160.720 and 161.092. The report also shall
identify attendance centers that have been categorizedW under federal law as needing
improvement or requiring specific school improvement strategies.
5.] The report card shall not limit or discourage other methods of public reporting and
accountability by local school districts and charter schools. Districts and charter schools
A
shall provide information included in the report card to parents, community members, andthe
print and broadcast news media[, and legislators] by December first annually or as soon
thereafter as the information is available tRo the district or charter school, giving preference to
methods that incorporate the reporting into substantive official communications such as
student report cards. The school district or charter schoolshall provide a printed copy of the
D
district-level or school-level report card to any patron upon request and shall make reasonable
efforts to supply businesses such as, but not limited to, real estate and employment firms with
copies or other informaHtion about the reports so that parents and businesses from outside the
district who may be contemplating relocation have access.
[6.] 5. For purposes of completing and distributing the annual report card as
T
prescribed in this section, a school district may include the data from a charter school located
within such school district, provided the local board of education or special administrative
board for sIuch district and the charter school reach mutual agreement for the inclusion of the
Wdata from the charter school [and the terms of such agreement are approved by the state board
of education]. The charter school shall not be required to be a part of the local educational
agency of such school district and may maintain a separate local educational agency status.
161.092. The state board of education shall:
(1) Adopt rules governing its own proceedings and formulate policies for the
guidance of the commissioner of education and the department of elementary and secondary
education;
(2) Carry out the educational policies of the state relating to public schools that are
provided by law and supervise instruction in the public schools;
(3) Direct the investment of all moneys received by the state to be applied to the
capital of any permanent fund established for the support of public education within the
jurisdiction of the department of elementary and secondary education and see that the funds
are applied to the branches of educational interest of the state that by grant, gift, devise or law

HB 2442 8
they were originally intended, and if necessary institute suit for and collect the funds and
return them to their legitimate channels;
(4) Cause to be assembled information which will reflect continuously the condition
and management of the public schools of the state;
(5) Require of county clerks or treasurers, boards of education or other school
N
officers, recorders and treasurers of cities, towns and villages, copies of all records required to
be made by them and all other information in relation to the funds and condition of schools
and the management thereof that is deemed necessary; W
(6) Provide blanks suitable for use by officials in reporting the information required
by the board;
(7) When conditions demand, cause the laws relating to schools to be published in a
A
separate volume, with pertinent notes and comments, for the guidance of those charged with
the execution of the laws;
(8) Grant, without fee exceptR as provided in section 168.021, certificates of
qualification and licenses to teach in any of the public schools of the state, establish
requirements therefor, formulate regulations governing the issuance thereof, and cause the
D
certificates to be revoked for the reasons and in the manner provided in section 168.071;
(9) (a) For all school years before the 2027-28 school year:
a. Classify theH public schools of the state, subject to limitations provided by law and
subdivision (14) of this section, establish requirements for the schools of each class, and
formulate rules governing the inspection and accreditation of schools preparatory to
T
classification, with such requirements taking effect not less than two years from the date of
adoption of the proposed rule by the state board of education, provided that this condition
shall not aIpply to any requirement for which a time line for adoption is mandated in either
Wfederal or state law[. Such rules shall include a process to allow any district that is accredited
without provision that does not meet the state board's promulgated criteria for a classification
designation of accredited with distinction to propose alternative criteria to the state board to
be classified as accredited with distinction]; and
b. Identify and recognize a minimum of two national school accreditation
agencies from which any district may seek to obtain accreditation; and
(b) For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school years, specify that any
district with current accreditation from at least one of the identified national school
accreditation agencies shall be considered to have full accreditation status, without
provision, for all purposes of state law and rules;
(10) Make an annual report on or before the first Wednesday after the first day of
January to the general assembly or, when it is not in session, to the governor for publication

HB 2442 9
and transmission to the general assembly. The report shall be for the last preceding school
year, and shall include:
(a) A statement of the number of public schools in the state, the number of pupils
attending the schools, their sex, and the branches taught;
(b) A statement of the number of teachers employed, their sex, their professional
N
training, and their average salary;
(c) A statement of the receipts and disbursements of public school funds of every
description, their sources, and the purposes for which theyW were disbursed;
(d) Suggestions for the improvement of public schools; and
(e) Any other information relative to the educational interests of the state that the law
requires or the board deems important;
A
(11) Make an annual report to the general assembly and the governor concerning
coordination with other agencies and departments of government that support family literacy
programs and other services which influRence educational attainment of children of all ages;
(12) Require from the chief officer of each division of the department of elementary
and secondary education, on or before the thirty-first day of August of each year, reports
D
containing information the board deems important and desires for publication;
(13) Cause fifty copies of its annual report to be reserved for the use of each division
of the state departmHent of elementary and secondary education, and ten copies for
preservation in the state library;
(14) Promulgate rules under which the board shall classify the public schools of the
T
state subject to the limitations under subdivision (9) of this section; provided that the
appropriate scoring guides, instruments, and procedures used in determining the accreditation
status of a Idistrict shall be subject to a public meeting upon notice in a newspaper of general
Wcirculation in each of the three most populous cities in the state and also a newspaper that is a
certified minority business enterprise or woman-owned business enterprise in each of the two
most populous cities in the state, and notice to each district board of education, each
superintendent of a school district, and to the speaker of the house of representatives, the
president pro tem of the senate, and the members of the joint committee on education, at least
fourteen days in advance of the meeting, which shall be conducted by the department of
elementary and secondary education not less than ninety days prior to their application in
accreditation, with all comments received to be reported to the state board of education;
(15) Have other powers and duties prescribed by law.
161.132. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of this section, the
department of elementary and secondary education includes the commissioner of education,
the members of the professional staff, and the other employees essential to the efficient
operation of the department.

HB 2442 10
2. Upon the recommendation of the commissioner the board shall appoint the
members of the professional staff and the other employees and fix their compensation.
3. (1) For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school years, the
department shall employ no more than two hundred members of the professional staff
and other employees. Such professional staff and employees shall be individuals who
N
are essential for gathering data, reporting, and ensuring transparency.
(2) No staff member or employee of the Missouri School for the Deaf or the
Missouri School for the Blind shall be counted within thWe two hundred professional staff
and employee limit provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
✔
A
R
D
H
T
I
W